Louisiana, session 2026, SB481.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 858 is hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
Art. 858. Review of ruling on motion for new trial
Neither the appellate nor supervisory jurisdiction of the supreme court or
other appellate court may be invoked to review the granting or the refusal to grant
a new trial, except for error of law. The showing of injustice that is required
before granting a motion for new trial pursuant to Article 851 is a question of
law. Any motion granted pursuant to Article 851(B)(1) shall require proving
either the error of law or the insufficiency of the evidence as a matter of law,
and shall be reviewable under this Article. The mover shall be required to
establish that, after viewing the evidence in a light most favorable to the
prosecution, no rational trier of fact could have found the essential elements of
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1434 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 481
the crime beyond a reasonable doubt.